Illinois, session 104th, HB3766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-65 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-65 new)7    Sec. 5-65. Community-based mental health professional; age 8qualification. Any person who is at least 18 years of age shall 9be qualified to provide community-based mental health services 10under the medical assistance program as a rehabilitative 11services associate or peer support worker if the person meets 12all other applicable eligibility requirements for 13certification as described in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 140.453(b)(6) 14and (7). The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 15Section. 16